Illinois, session 104th, SB2603.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The sum of $4,514,600, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 7the Commission on Government Forecasting and Accountability to 8meet its operational expenses for the fiscal year beginning 9July 1, 2024. 10    Section 10. The sum of $1,500,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 12Fund to the Commission on Government Forecasting and 13Accountability for the purpose of making pension pick up 14contributions to the State Employees' Retirement System of 15Illinois for affected legislative staff employees for the 16fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024. 17    Section 15. The sum of $2,350,600, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 19Fund to the Architect of the Capitol to meet its ordinary and 20contingent expenses for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 212024.   SB2603- 2 -SDS104 00021 AIH 10021 b1    Section 16. The sum of $3,500,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 3business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 4made for such purpose in Article 30, Section 16 of Public Act 5103-0589, is reappropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 6the Architect of the Capitol for the purchase of equipment and 7other related expenses. 8    Section 20. The sum of $1,390,700, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 10Fund to the Joint Committee on Administrative Rules to meet 11its operational expenses for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 122024. 13    Section 25. The sum of $475,000, or so much thereof as may 14be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 15the Legislative Audit Commission to meet its operational 16expenses for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024. 17    Section 30. The sum of $200,000, or so much thereof as may 18be necessary, is appropriated to the Legislative Ethics 19Commission to meet the ordinary and contingent expenses of the 20Commission for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024. 21    Section 35. The sum of $920,000, or so much thereof as may   SB2603- 3 -SDS104 00021 AIH 10021 b1be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund 2for Legislative Inspector General its ordinary and contingent 3expenses for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024. 4    Section 40. The sum of $6,642,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Legislative Information System to meet its 7operational expenses for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 82024. 9    Section 45. The following sum, or so much of that amount as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Assembly Computer Equipment Revolving Fund to the Legislative 12Information System:13  For Purchase, Maintenance, and Rental of 14   General Assembly Electronic Data Processing15   Equipment and for other operational purposes16   of the General Assembly.........................$1,600,000 17    Section 50. The sum of $3,738,000, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 19Fund to the Legislative Printing Unit to meet its operational 20expenses for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024. 21    Section 55. The sum of $4,365,360, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue   SB2603- 4 -SDS104 00021 AIH 10021 b1Fund to the Legislative Reference Bureau to meet its 2operational expenses for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 32024. 4ARTICLE 9995    Section 999. Effective date. This Act tales efect July 1, 62025.